California, session 20252026, SB1155.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) California is home to approximately 150,000 federal civilian employees and tens of thousands of federal contractors who provide essential services to the state.(b) During a federal government shutdown, these employees are either furloughed or required to work without pay, creating immediate and severe financial hardship.(c) The loss of a predictable paycheck through no fault of the employee puts families at risk of eviction, homelessness, and permanent credit damage.(d) It is the intent of the Legislature to provide temporary, emergency protections to ensure that those who serve the public are not displaced from their homes due to federal legislative stalemates.SEC. 2. Section 1946.4 is added to the Civil Code, to read:1946.4. (a) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Covered period” means the period beginning on the first day of a government shutdown and ending 30 days after the date on which the shutdown ends and backpay is authorized.(2) “Covered tenant” means any individual employed by a federal agency, or an individual employed by a federal contractor, who is a tenant and whose primary residence is located in California and whose income is materially impacted by a government shutdown.(3) “Government shutdown” means any lapse in federal appropriations that results in a furlough or the requirement for federal employees to work without pay.(4) “Landlord” means an owner of residential rental property or the owner’s agent.(5) “Material impact” means a reduction in household income or a delay in pay resulting from a government shutdown that renders the tenant unable to pay the full amount of rent due.(6) “Nonrent fees” means mandatory or optional charges imposed on a tenant by a landlord in addition to rent.(7) “Tenant” means tenant, subtenant, lessee, or sublessee.(b) Notwithstanding any other law, and subject to the requirements in subdivision (c), all of the following shall apply:(1) A landlord shall not initiate or continue an unlawful detainer action to evict a covered tenant for nonpayment of rent or nonrent fees for the duration of the covered period.(2) In any pending eviction action against a covered tenant, the court shall stay the proceedings for the duration of the covered period if the covered tenant’s ability to pay rent is materially affected by the government shutdown.(3) A landlord shall not charge or collect any late fees, interest, or other penalties related to the nonpayment of rent or nonrent fees by a covered tenant during the covered period.(c) To qualify for the protections under subdivision (b), a covered tenant shall provide both of the following to the landlord or the court, as applicable:(1) Written notice within 15 days of a missed rent payment stating that the covered tenant is a federal employee or contractor affected by a government shutdown.(2) A copy of a furlough notice, a “stay-at-home” order, or a pay stub showing zero dollars ($0) in earnings due to a government shutdown.(d) (1) This section does not relieve a covered tenant of the obligation to pay rent.(2) All rent deferred during the covered period shall be due and payable within 30 days of the date the covered tenant receives their first full paycheck containing retroactive backpay.(3) Landlords and covered tenants are encouraged to enter into a written repayment plan for any remaining arrears.(e) Any person who knowingly violates this section shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000) per violation, in addition to any other remedies available under law.(f) (1) A covered tenant may raise a violation of this section as an affirmative defense in any action for unlawful detainer.(2) The affirmative defense created by this subdivision shall not apply to any unlawful detainer action other than an action based on the nonpayment of rent or nonrent fees.(g) On or before January 1, 2028, the Judicial Council shall adopt or modify forms as needed to implement this section.